Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,132
Forms; readability standards; filing requirements.

The director may establish readability standards for individual contract, group contract, and evidence of coverage forms. No group or individual contract, evidence of coverage, or amendment thereto shall be delivered or issued for delivery in this state unless its form has been filed with and approved by the director. If an evidence of coverage issued pursuant to and incorporated in a contract issued in this state is intended for delivery in another state and the evidence of coverage has been approved for use in the state in which it is to be delivered, the evidence of coverage shall not need to be submitted to the director for approval. The director may require the submission of whatever relevant information he or she deems necessary in determining whether to approve or disapprove a filing.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 41.